Utah statutes.
20A-3-403.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1) (a)  "Ballot," "disabled voter's ballot" and "official Utah military
ballot" means the same ballots that will be submitted to and used by other
voters of Utah at the primary or general election.
(b)  "Ballot" includes any official federal ballot provided by any Act of
Congress to allow voting by voters in the military service of the United
States.
(2)  "Federal postcard application form" means the form created by the Federal
Voting Assistance Program (FVAP) which allows military and overseas citizens
to register to vote and apply for an absentee ballot.
(3)  "Hostile fire zone" means a geographical area in which forces are
assigned on official temporary duty and placed in imminent danger of being
exposed to hostile fire or explosion of hostile mines.
(4)  "Military voter" means each person who is qualified as a voter under the
Utah Constitution and laws or who is eligible for registration and who would,
by registration, be qualified to vote, and who is:
(a)  a member of the armed forces of the United States while in the active
service or is the spouse or dependent of that member;
(b)  a member of the merchant marine of the United States or is the spouse or
dependent of that member;
(c)  a civilian employee of the United States in all categories who is serving
outside the territorial limits of the United States whether or not the
employee is subject to the civil service laws and the Classification Act of
1949, and whether or not the employee is paid from funds appropriated by the
Congress or is the spouse or dependent of that member when residing with or
accompanying them; and
(d)  a member of religious groups or welfare agencies assisting members of the
armed forces, who is officially attached to and serving with the armed forces,
or is the spouse or dependent of that member.
(5)  "Overseas citizen voter" means:
(a)  a member of the armed forces of the United States while in the active
service or the spouse or dependent of that member;
(b)  a member of the merchant marines of the United States or the spouse or
dependent of that member; and
(c)  a citizen of the United States residing outside the territorial limits of
the United States or the spouse or dependent of that member when residing with
them or accompanying them.
